Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 2

Tennessee Fish and Wildlife Commission

70-1-201. Creation — Appointment of members — Terms.

An independent and separate administrative board of conservation for game, fish and wildlife of the state is created, to be known and referred to as the Tennessee fish and wildlife commission, hereinafter referred to as the “fish and wildlife commission” or the “commission,” to consist of thirteen (13) citizens of this state, which citizens shall be well informed on the subject of the conservation of game animals, birds and fish in this state. Nine (9) of these citizens shall be appointed by the governor, two (2) shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate, and two (2) shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, each to be appointed within the period provided in this section. In making appointments to the fish and wildlife commission, the governor and the speakers shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older, at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority, and at least two (2) persons serving on the commission are female.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (b), each member shall be confirmed by the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and by joint resolution of the general assembly prior to beginning a term of office.

If the general assembly is not in session at the time a member is appointed to fill a vacancy resulting from the expiration of a term, the member of the commission whose term has expired shall serve until a new appointee is confirmed as provided in subdivision (b)(1).

If the general assembly is not in session at the time a member is appointed to fill a vacancy not resulting from the expiration of a term, the new appointee shall serve for the term appointed unless such appointment is not confirmed within sixty (60) calendar days after the general assembly next convenes in regular session following such appointment.

If the general assembly is not in session when initial appointments are made, all initial appointments shall serve the terms prescribed pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), unless such appointments are not confirmed within sixty (60) calendar days after the general assembly next convenes in regular session following such appointments.

The entire membership of the wildlife resources commission shall be vacated and shall be replaced by new appointments made to the fish and wildlife commission pursuant to this subsection (c). In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed commission members, initial appointments shall be made as follows:

Three (3) of the governor's initial appointments, one (1) from each grand division of the state as provided in § 70-1-204(a), and one (1) initial appointment by each speaker shall be made for a term of two (2) years and eight (8) months;

Three (3) of the governor's initial appointments, one (1) from each grand division of the state as provided in § 70-1-204(a), and one (1) initial appointment by each speaker shall be made for a term of four (4) years and eight (8) months; and

Three (3) of the governor's initial appointments, one (1) from each grand division of the state as provided in § 70-1-204(a), shall be made for a term of six (6) years and eight (8) months.

For purpose of calculating terms, the initial term of office of each commission member shall begin on July 1, 2012.

At the conclusion of the initial terms, each regular term of a commission member appointed by a speaker shall be four (4) years and each regular term of a commission member appointed by the governor shall be six (6) years. For purpose of calculating regular terms, each term shall begin on March 1 and shall expire on the last day of February.

No commission member shall serve consecutive terms. For the purposes of this subdivision (c)(4), a commission member shall be considered as having served a term if such member has served more than two (2) years of an initial term, regular term or unexpired term on the fish and wildlife commission.

A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the appointing authority making the original appointment for the remainder of any unexpired term or, if a term has expired, for a regular term.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee fish and wildlife commission, created by this section terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 21 purported to amend this section by substituting “energy and environment committee of the senate” for “environment, conservation and tourism committee of the senate” in subdivision (b)(1), effective July 1, 2012. Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1 had previously made the substitution, effective June 30, 2012; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 21 was not given effect.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Appointments to state boards or commissions, age discrimination prohibited, § 4-1-403.

Law Reviews.

Publication Under the New Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act and the Public's Right to Know (John Beasley), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 187.

70-1-202. Compensation of members — Travel expenses.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services as members of such commission, except that they shall be paid their actual and necessary traveling expenses for six (6) regular meetings each year and not more than six (6) called meetings during any one (1) year. They shall also be paid their actual and necessary travel expenses for attending to other commission business approved by the chair.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

70-1-203. Officers — Meetings — Ex officio members.

The commission shall elect a chair, a vice chair and a secretary. The secretary may or may not be a member of the commission. These officers shall be elected for a period of one (1) year. After organization, the commission shall hold six (6) regular meetings and may hold as many as six (6) special meetings in any one (1) year at such times and places as the commission shall elect, for which their expenses shall be paid as provided in § 70-1-202.

Seven (7) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The governor, the commissioner of environment and conservation and the commissioner of agriculture, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the commission and shall not be included in calculation of a quorum.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

70-1-204. Appointments to commission.

Appointments to be made by the governor shall be made from districts of the grand divisions of the state in which the vacancy occurred, and the boundaries of the nine (9) districts shall remain the same as the boundaries that were in effect on February 9, 1959.

Appointments to be made by the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives shall be made from the grand divisions of this state as described in title 4, chapter 1, part 2. No more than one (1) member appointed by the speaker of the senate shall be from the same grand division. No more than one (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house shall be from the same grand division. The speakers shall strive to ensure each grand division is represented in their appointments. No more than one (1) speaker appointed member shall be from any one (1) county.

All appointments shall be made from persons having or possessing the qualifications specified by § 70-1-201, which qualifications shall be determined by consultation with known and recognized leaders in the field of conservation in this state. At least one (1) person shall have or possess the qualifications specified by § 67-6-207(e), which qualifications shall be determined by consultation with known and recognized leaders in the field of agriculture in this state. The governor shall strive to ensure that the concerns of the typical hunter and angler are represented in appointments made to the commission.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

70-1-205. Removal of commission members.

The governor may remove a governor-appointed commission member for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, after first delivering to the commission member a copy of the charges and affording the commission member an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel to defend against the charges, upon not less than ten (10) business days' notice.

If such commission member is removed, the governor shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete statement of all charges made against the commission member and the governor's findings on the charges, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

The governor shall fill vacancies caused by removal in accordance with § 70-1-201(c)(5).

Any member of the commission who misses four (4) regular or special meetings of the commission during any year of the commission member's term of office ipso facto vacates the member's office as a member of the commission. Such vacancies shall be filled in accordance with § 70-1-201(c)(5). This subsection (d) shall not apply to ex officio members.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

70-1-206. Duties and functions.

The fish and wildlife commission is directed and authorized to perform the following duties and functions:

Appoint and dismiss the executive director;

Approve the budget pursuant to § 70-1-306;

Promulgate necessary rules, regulations, and proclamations as required under this title and title 69, chapter 9. The commission is also authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to permit a licensed trapper to release small game animals in counties contiguous to the counties where the animals were trapped;

Establish objectives within the state policy that will enable the wildlife resources agency to develop, manage and maintain sound programs of hunting, fishing, trapping and other wildlife related outdoor recreational activities;

Establish the salary of the executive director of the wildlife resources agency;

Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the Reelfoot Lake natural area, as provided in title 11, chapter 14, part 1; and

Promulgate rules and regulations to adjust fees for licenses and permits in this title and to establish new hunting, fishing and trapping licenses and permits as deemed appropriate along with necessary fees. Adjusting or establishing fees shall be in such amounts as may be necessary to administer the wildlife laws; provided, that the percentage increase in total revenue from a license package containing one (1) or more licenses or permits, or both, shall not exceed the percent of increase in the average consumer price index, all items-city average, as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, on the first day of March 1990, or, in the case of any permit, license or permit/license package fee adjustment after the initial adjustment under this subdivision (a)(7), the difference in the average consumer price index, all items-city average between the dates of one (1) adjustment and any subsequent adjustment; provided further, however, that individual fee adjustment amounts may be rounded up to the next dollar amount. All such fees, and any adjustments to the fees, shall be deposited in the wildlife resources fund and shall be expended solely for the administration and operation of the agency’s programs and responsibilities authorized pursuant to this chapter. Further, the commission shall report actions taken on permits, licenses, and fees to be assessed following the promulgation of the proposed rules and regulations to the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives.

The fish and wildlife commission shall become knowledgeable in and familiar with the special needs of handicapped and disabled veterans.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 22 purported to amend this section by substituting “energy and environment committee of the senate” for “environment, conservation and tourism committee of the senate” in subdivision (a)(7), effective July 1, 2012. Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1 had previously made the substitution, effective June 30, 2012; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 22 was not given effect.

Cross-References. Fees and penalties not to be established by rule or regulation, § 70-1-102.

Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

Reelfoot Lake natural area, administration, § 11-14-116.

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of waterfowl blinds on Reelfoot Lake, OAG 97-152, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 195 (11/05/97).

Regulation of Reelfoot Lake waterfowl blinds by wildlife agencies, OAG 98-007, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/9/98).

Municipality unable to prohibit state authorized hunting, OAG 98-038, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/9/98).

Delegation of authority by the general assembly to state wildlife agencies, OAG 07-19, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/22/07).

70-1-207. Corporate sponsorship on motor vehicles and vessels.

The fish and wildlife commission is authorized to develop rules and regulations for corporate sponsorship on appropriate agency motor vehicles and vessels; provided, however, that no corporate sponsorship shall be placed on agency law enforcement motor vehicles or vessels. Such rules and regulations may include, but are not limited to, signage placement, safety concerns and prohibited practices.

Such commercial sponsorship shall not include, identify or promote:

Alcohol or tobacco products;

Adult-oriented establishments, as defined in § 7-51-1102 or § 7-51-1401;

Political candidacies, political issue advocacy, or political campaign advertising, as prohibited in § 2-19-144; or

Any unlawful conduct or activities.

The department shall prefer sponsorship by organizations that are wildlife or boating related.

The sponsorship message shall include only the name or logo of the sponsor or both.

The sponsorship message may only be located on the back of the vehicle or vessel.

The logo of the sponsor shall not exceed four hundred square inches (400 sq. in.) in size, and the lettering identifying the sponsor shall not exceed eight inches (8") in height.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.

70-1-208. Fish and wildlife commission successor to wildlife resources commission.

The fish and wildlife commission created by this part is the successor to the wildlife resources commission. All rules, procedures, records, reports, functions and duties carried out by the prior commission are hereby transferred to the successor entity.

Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 70-1-201 — 70-1-207 (Acts 1949, ch. 50, §§ 1-5, 13; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5178.2 – 5178.5 (Williams, §§ 5120.19 – 5120.23, 5120.31); Acts 1953, ch. 254, § 1; modified; 1959, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1971, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, §§ 15, 21; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 2; 1978, ch. 656, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-101 – 51-105, 51-134; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 2; 1986, ch. 503, § 1; 1987, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 591, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 73; 1989, ch. 104, § 1; 1989, ch. 309, § 2; 1995, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 605, § 9; 2003, ch. 61, § 1; 2004, ch. 422, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 9, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 332, § 2), concerning the wildlife resources commission, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 1, effective June 30, 2012.